test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kannwl28_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kannõlʼ: # Noun (28) kannõlʼ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kannõlʼ+N+Sg+Nom: kannõlʼ
     kannõlʼ+N+Sg+Gen: kandlõ
     kannõlʼ+N+Sg+Par: kannõld
     kannõlʼ+N+Sg+Ill: kandlõhe
     kannõlʼ+N+Pl+Gen: [kandlidõ, kannõldõ]
     kannõlʼ+N+Pl+Par: kandlit
     kannõlʼ+N+Pl+Ill: [kandlihe, kannõldõhe]
     kannõlʼ+N+Pl+All: [kandlilõ, kannõldõlõ]

     kannõl+N+Sg+Nom: kannõl
     kannõl+N+Sg+Gen: kandlõ
     kannõl+N+Sg+Par: kannõld
     kannõl+N+Sg+Ill: [kandlõhe, kandlõdõ]
     kannõl+N+Sg+Ine: [kandlõn, kandlõh, kandlõhn]
     kannõl+N+Sg+Ela: kandlõst
     kannõl+N+Sg+All: kandlõlõ
     kannõl+N+Sg+Ade: kandlõl
     kannõl+N+Sg+Abl: kandlõlt
     kannõl+N+Sg+Tra: kandlõs
     kannõl+N+Sg+Ter: kandlõniq
     kannõl+N+Sg+Abe: kandlõldaq
     kannõl+N+Sg+Com: kandlõgaq
     kannõl+N+Pl+Nom: kandlõq
     kannõl+N+Pl+Gen: [kandlidõ, kandliidõ, kannõldõ]
     kannõl+N+Pl+Par: [kandlit, kandliid]
     kannõl+N+Pl+Ill: [kandlihe, kandliihe, kandlidõ, kandliidõ, kannõldõhe]
     kannõl+N+Pl+Ine: [kandlin, kandliin, kandlih, kandliih, kandlihn, kandliihn, kannõldõn, kannõldõh, kannõldõhn]
     kannõl+N+Pl+Ela: [kandlist, kandliist, kannõldõst]
     kannõl+N+Pl+All: [kandlilõ, kandliilõ, kannõldõlõ]
     kannõl+N+Pl+Ade: [kandlil, kandliil, kannõldõl]
     kannõl+N+Pl+Abl: [kandlilt, kandliilt, kannõldõlt]
     kannõl+N+Pl+Tra: [kandlis, kandliis, kannõldõs]
     kannõl+N+Pl+Ter: [kandliniq, kandliiniq, kannõldõniq]
     kannõl+N+Pl+Abe: [kandlildaq, kandliildaq, kannõldõldaq]
     kannõl+N+Pl+Com: [kandlidõgaq, kandliidõgaq, kannõldõgaq]
